Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. Non-exempt Religious and Private Schools.

Sec. 14.45.010.
Teachers to secure certificates. [Repealed, § 59 ch 98 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 14.45.020.
Commissioner may furnish examination questions for and grant diplomas to eighth grade pupils. [Repealed, § 6 ch 11 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 14.45.030.
Non-exempt schools.

Teachers and others in charge of religious or other private schools not operated in compliance with AS

14.45.100

—

14.45.130

are not exempt from laws and regulations relating to education.
Non-exempt schools shall make regular monthly attendance reports and annual reports to the commissioner in the same manner as teachers and superintendents in the public schools.

History.

(§ 37-11-3 ACLA 1949; am § 4 ch 11 SLA 1984)